Alabama, session 2026rs, SB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-48-111.03, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-48-111.03
(a) A custodian of voting machinestabulators shall be
appointed by a committee composed of the seniorpresiding
circuit judge, who shall also be the chair, the judge of
probate, tax collectorcircuit clerk, sheriff, and the county
judgepresiding district judge. SuchThe custodian of voting
machinestabulators shall have attended a recognized school
that teaches thetraining course that teaches operation and
handling of voting machinestabulators, or in lieu thereof must
have had at least three years' experience in the operation and
handling of voting machinestabulators.
(b) The custodian shall be responsible for performing
all duties as set out in Section 17-9-28necessary, or
incidental, to maintaining the county voting tabulators
including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Testing all voting tabulators and comparing the
test results to the manufacturer's specifications ensuring a
Page 1

test results to the manufacturer's specifications ensuring a
SB64 Enrolled
perfect match.
(2) Installing new paper rolls in all tabulators.
(3) Clearing any testing totals.
(4) Sealing voting tabulator units for delivery to the
voting precincts.
(5) Testing all equipment for use by individuals under
the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) to ensure they are
working properly.
(6) Conducting a public test of the voting tabulators
as scheduled by the judge of probate.
(7) Resealing all public test units for delivery to the
voting precincts.
(8) Overseeing the delivery of equipment to the polling
precincts.
(9) Supporting the voting tabulators and ADA equipment
on election day.
(10) Overseeing the pickup of all voting tabulators and
ADA equipment and securing the tabulators and equipment at the
Marshall County Elections Warehouse.
(11) Charging voting equipment if required to ensure
that the machines are operational on election day.
(12) Testing all equipment for any recounts and
attending the recounts.
(c) The custodian of voting machinestabulators shall
receive a salary in the amount of eight thousand nine hundred
dollars ($8,900)twenty-seven thousand dollars ($27,000) per
annum payable in equal monthly installments, effective upon
July 1, 2026. The Marshall County Commission, by resolution
Page 2

July 1, 2026. The Marshall County Commission, by resolution
SB64 Enrolled
adopted in a duly called meeting of the Marshall County
Commission, may provide for increases in the salary of the
custodian of voting tabulators beginning on June 1, 2028. The
salary shall be paid from the general fund of the county. and
before entering uponBefore beginning his or her duties, the
custodian shall be bonded in the sum of ten twenty thousand
dollars ($10,000)($20,000) for the faithful performance of his
or her duties as are other public officials."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
SB64 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB64
Senate 20-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 22-Jan-26




By: Senator Kitchens
Page 4